District of Columbia statutes.
4-1321.03

Nature and contents of reports.

(a)

Each person required to make a report of a known or suspected neglected child shall:

(1)

Immediately make an oral report of the case to the Child and Family Services Agency or the Metropolitan Police Department of the District of Columbia; and

(2)

Make a written report of the case if requested by said Division or Police or if the abuse involves drug-related activity.

(b)

The report shall include, but need not be limited to, the following information if it is known to the person making the report:

(1)

The name, age, sex, and address of the following individuals:

(A)

The child who is the subject of the report;

(B)

Each of the child’s siblings and other children in the household; and

(C)

Each of the child’s parents or other persons responsible for the child’s care;

(2)

The nature and extent of the abuse or neglect of the child and any previous abuse or neglect, if known;

(3)

All other information which the person making the report believes may be helpful in establishing the cause of the abuse or neglect and the identity of the person responsible for the abuse or neglect; and

(4)

If the source was required to report under this subchapter, the identity and occupation of the source, how to contact the source and a statement of the actions taken by the source concerning the child.

History

Nov. 6, 1966, 80 Stat. 1354, Pub. L. 89-775, § 3
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title I, § 103(d), 24 DCR 3341
Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-87, § 2(b), 37 DCR 50
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-341, § 3, 52 DCR 2315
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 203(b), 53 DCR 8610

Cross References

Child Protection Register, information retained, see 4-1302.02.
“Substantiated report” and “Unfounded report” defined, see 4-1301.02

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-1301.02, § 4-1302.02, § 4-1321.02, and § 16-1056.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1353.
1973 Ed., § 2-163.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-341 rewrote subsec. (b)(1)(B) which had read as follows: “(B) Each of the child’s siblings; and”
D.C. Law 16-306, in subsec. (a)(1), substituted “Child and Family Services Agency” for “Child Protective Services Division of the Department of Human Services”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).